North Dakota statutes. TITLE 36 Livestock
CHAPTER 36-06 Purchase of Livestock by Packing Plants [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-06-01.
Packing plant defined. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 5, § 2; 1931, ch. 6, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 36-0601; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-06-02.
Livestock purchased by weight to be graded — Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 5, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 36-0602; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 376; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-06-03.
Penalty for purchase of livestock by weight without grading the same. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 5, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 36-0603; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 377; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-06-04.
Livestock sold or purchased at packing plant to be weighed by licensed weighmaster — Duplicate scale ticket — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 375, § 1.

Cross-References.

Fees for inspecting livestock scales, see N.D.C.C. § 64-02-10.

36-06-05.
Weighmaster’s license — By whom issued — Application — Bond — Renewal. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 375, § 1.

36-06-05.1.
Conviction not bar to licensure — Exceptions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 375, § 1.

36-06-06.
Revocation of weighmaster’s license — Notice and hearing. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 375, § 1.

36-06-07.
Remuneration of weighmaster of packing plant paid by whom. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 375, § 1.

36-06-08.
Penalty for wrongful weighing or issuing of a false scale ticket. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.